Maryland, session 2025, HB1154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
3–413.
(A) The Commissioner or the Commissioner’s designee may remove an
incarcerated individual from the program at any time and for any reason.
(B) THE COMMISSIONER OR THE COMMISSIONER’S DESIGNEE SHALL
REMOVE AN INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL FROM THE PROGRAM FOR VIOLATING A
CONDITION OF THE INCARCERATED INDIVIDUAL’S PLACEMENT IN THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1154*